Idaho, session 2025, S1057.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3029L, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3029L. CHILD TAX CREDIT. (1) For taxable years beginning on or af-
ter January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2026, there shall be allowed to a
taxpayer a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by this chapter in
the amount of two hundred five dollars ($205) with respect to each quali-
fying child of the taxpayer. For purposes of this section, the term "qual-
ifying child" has the meaning as defined in section 24(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code, and shall also include any preborn child, as defined in sec-
tion 18-8801(3), Idaho Code, from any pregnancy diagnosed as occurring dur-
ing such tax year as long as the preborn child was not delivered to term dur-
ing the same tax year. Any person claiming a credit for a qualifying child
who is a preborn child under the provisions of this section shall include a
letter from a licensed physician or licensed midwife of the preborn child's
mother certifying that the pregnancy resulting in such preborn child was di-
agnosed as occurring during the tax year and did not result in a delivery to
term within the same tax year. In the case of a preborn child of a mother
who is also a dependent, the tax credit provided under this section may be
claimed by either such dependent or, if not claimed by the dependent, the
person who is claiming the dependent on such person's tax return. In no event
shall more than one (1) taxpayer be allowed this credit for the same quali-
fying child. This credit is available only to Idaho residents. Any part-
year resident entitled to a credit under this section shall receive a propor-
tional credit reflecting the part of the year in which the part-year resident
was domiciled in Idaho.
(2) In the case of divorced parents or parents who do not live together,
if and the qualifying child is a preborn child, the mother of the preborn
child shall claim the credit. If the qualifying child is not a preborn child
and the qualifying child is in the custody of one or both of the child's par-
ents for more than one-half of a calendar year, such child is the qualifying
child of the custodial parent for the taxable year beginning during such cal-
endar year. However, the child may be the qualifying child of the noncusto-
dial parent if either of the following requirements are met:
(a) A court of competent jurisdiction has unconditionally awarded, in
writing, to the noncustodial parent the tax benefits associated with
the child pursuant to section 32-706, Idaho Code, and the noncustodial


parent attaches a copy of the court order to the noncustodial parent's
income tax return for the taxable year; or
(b) The custodial parent signs a written declaration that such custo-
dial parent will not claim the credit of this section with respect to
such child for any taxable year beginning in such calendar year and the
noncustodial parent attaches such written declaration to the noncusto-
dial parent's income tax return for the taxable year beginning during
such calendar year.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2025.